Florida, session 2026, HB665.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Effective July 1, 2026, paragraph (ffff) is
added to subsection (7) of section 212.08, Florida Statutes, to
read:
212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(7) MISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.—Exemptions provided to any
entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is
otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a
representative or employee of the entity by any means,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb665-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 665 2026
including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even
when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed
by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by
this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is
otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has
obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department
or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as
required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made
with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this
subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an
exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict
compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and
shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer
this subsection.
(ffff) Certain motor vehicle sales to 100-percent disabled
veterans.—
1. Also exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter are
sales of new motor vehicles that are required to be licensed
pursuant to s. 320.08(1), (2), (3)(a), (b), (c), or (e), or (9)
made to and titled in the name of a disabled veteran with a
service-connected permanent and total disability rating of 100
percent as evidenced by possession of an identification card
issued by the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to s.
295.17.
2. Upon request, the department shall issue a consumer's
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb665-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 665 2026
certificate of exemption expressly limited to the purchase of a
new motor vehicle under this paragraph to any person who holds
an identification card issued by the Department of Veterans'
Affairs pursuant to s. 295.17. The consumer's certificate of
exemption shall be issued without charge and shall be of such
size as to be capable of being carried in a wallet or billfold.
Section 2. (1) The Department of Revenue is authorized,
and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules
pursuant to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of
implementing the amendment made by this act to s. 212.08(7),
Florida Statutes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
emergency rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
effective for 6 months after adoption and may be renewed during
the pendency of procedures to adopt permanent rules addressing
the subject of the emergency rules.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2028.
Section 3. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb665-01-c1